src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v3_ele_notinf
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3 v12pers_short ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Der/A+A:^WG%>le x_31_ee_oblique ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WG%>thiin K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Der/A+A:%>e x_31_ee_oblique ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Der/A+A+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>^U%>t K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG^hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>le%>^V%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>le%>^V%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Der/A+A:%>le%>^V%>v^A x_21_odd ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; ! ajattelisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:^WG%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:^WG%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:^WG%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:e%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:e%>m^All^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATON ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v3_ele_odd !!≈ **@CODE@** kävelä:kävel
+V+Inf:^WG%>^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WG%>thiin K ;  
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e v12pers_long ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3 v12pers_long ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>^U K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:^WG%>^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>^U%>t K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>ee%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>ee%>v^At K ;
!+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>e%>^V%>v^A K ;
!+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>e%>^V%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

!! * aukaista > aukaisemma
!! * täristä > tärisemä

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; ! kävelisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4sim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:^WG%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:^WG%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:^WG%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:e%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:e%>m^Al^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATONodd ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen_odd ;

LEXICON v3_ise !!≈ **@CODE@** aukaista:aukaise
+v1:is v3_ise_inflection ; ! täristä

LEXICON v3_aise !!≈ **@CODE@** aukaista:aukaise
+v1+Dial/Por:is v3_ise_inflection ; ! aukaista, aukaisen, ...
+v1+Dial/Por:s v3_ise_inflection ; ! aukasta, aukasen, ...
+v2+Dial/Var:s v3_ise_inflection ; ! aukasta, aukasen, ...
+v2+Dial/Jok:s v3_ise_inflection ; ! aukasta, aukasen, ...

LEXICON v3_ise_inflection
+V+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>see K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>se%>^V%>v^A K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>e%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>se%>^V%>v^At K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>e%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;  
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e v12pers_long ; ! aukaisemma
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3 v12pers_long ; ! aukaisimma
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t^U^WG%>t K ; 
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>se%>^V%>v^A K ;
!+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>e%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>se%>^V%>v^At K ;
!+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>e%>v^At K ; ! Not sure about the suffix mark placements here. TODO Goes through: aukaisseevat; Missing results: aukasevat, Unexpected results: aukasseevat. This should only be on aukas (s) and not aukais (ss). Also TODO TODO TODO generalize to all v3_ise. In general look at aukas vs aukais generalizing

+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; ! aukaisisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4sim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>k^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:e%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:e%>m^Al^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATONodd ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen_odd ;

LEXICON v3_lnr !!≈ **@CODE@** ja vartalo on pan-
+V+Inf:%>^N^A K ; !! * pitää tehdä ^D
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^N%>ee K ;         ! tullee
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>e%>e K ;  ! tulee
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Der/A+A:%>nee x_21_odd_oblique ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>^N^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N%>ee%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^N%>ee%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t^U^WG%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>e^WG%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>e^WG%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>e^WG%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>e^WG%>m^All^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>e^WG%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATON ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v3_s !!≈ **@CODE@** kusta, nousta, pestä, päästä ja vartalo on kus-
+V+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>s^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>s^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>s^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t%>ee%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^N%>ee%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t^U^WG%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>e^WG%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>e^WG%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>e^WG%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>e^WG%>m^All^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>e^WG%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATON ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen ;
