src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
kiiluilla:kiiluil v3_ele_odd ;
kylväillä:kylväil v3_ele_odd ;
kattela:katt2el v3_ele_odd ;
kiussaila:kiussail v3_ele_odd ;
kruisaila:kruisail v3_ele_odd ;
vaitela:vait2el v3_ele_odd ;
ommela:ompel v3_ele_odd ;
piđelä:pitel v3_ele_odd ;
päätelä:päättel v3_ele_odd ;
röytelä:röyttel v3_ele_odd ;
souđela:soutel v3_ele_odd ;
työtelä:työt2el v3_ele_odd ; ! XXX vai työđelä?
puhela:puhel v3_ele_odd ;
ajela:ajel v3_ele_odd ;
viljelä:viljel v3_ele_odd ;
vittuila:vitt2uil v3_ele_odd ;
suojela:suojel v3_ele_odd ;
varjela:varjel v3_ele_odd ;
palela:palel v3_ele_odd ;
laulela:laulel v3_ele_odd ;
tapela:tappel v3_ele_odd ;
juđela:jutel v3_ele_odd ;
kyselä:kysel v3_ele_odd ;
kohđela:kohtel v3_ele_odd ;
nuhđela:nuhtel v3_ele_odd ;
röhđelä:röhtel v3_ele_odd ; ! XXX vai röhtelä ??
vaiđela:vaitel v3_ele_odd ; ! XXX vai vaitela?
voiđela:voitel v3_ele_odd ;
kiilelä:kiiltel v3_ele_odd ; ! XXX vai kiillelä:kiiltel ?
kannela:kantel v3_ele_odd ;
lennelä:lentel v3_ele_odd ;
kuunela:kuuntel v3_ele_odd ;
käänelä:kääntel v3_ele_odd ; 
kierelä:kiertel v3_ele_odd ;
kastela:kastel v3_ele_odd ;
haistela:haistel v3_ele_odd ;
maistela:maistel v3_ele_odd ;
taistela:taistel v3_ele_odd ;
kiistelä:kiistel v3_ele_odd ;
pistelä:pistel v3_ele_odd ;
luistela:luistel v3_ele_odd ;
muistela:muistel v3_ele_odd ;
nostela:nostel v3_ele_odd ;
keitelä:keittel v3_ele_odd ;
kiitelä:kiittel v3_ele_odd ;
koitela:koittel v3_ele_odd ;
poltela:polttel v3_ele_odd ;
totela:tottel v3_ele_odd ;
puutela:puuttel v3_ele_odd ;
suutela:suut2el v3_ele_odd ;
jutela:juttel v3_ele_odd ;
muutela:muuttel v3_ele_odd ;
näytelä:näyttel v3_ele_odd ;
röhtelä:röht2el v3_ele_odd ;
huuđela:huutel v3_ele_odd ;
palvela:palvel v3_ele_odd ;
aliarvela:ali#arvel v3_ele_odd ;
arvela:arvel v3_ele_odd ;
kirvelä:kirvel v3_ele_odd ;
kävelä:kävel v3_ele_odd ;
makkaila:makk2ail v3_ele_odd ;
hikkaila:hikk2ail v3_ele_odd ;
huokkaila:huokk2ail v3_ele_odd ;
ruokkaila:ruokk2ail v3_ele_odd ;
kilppaila:kilpp2ail v3_ele_odd ;
shoppaila:shopp2ail v3_ele_odd ;
ihhaila:ihhail v3_ele_odd ;
puuhaila:puuhail v3_ele_odd ;
praamaila:praamail v3_ele_odd ;
hommaila:hommail v3_ele_odd ;
kuvvaila:kuvvail v3_ele_odd ;
kokkeila:kokk2eil v3_ele_odd ;
korreila:korr2eil v3_ele_odd ;
sätheilä:sätheil v3_ele_odd ;
ylppeilä:ylppeil v3_ele_odd ;
rukkoila:rukk2oil v3_ele_odd ;
muijoila:muijoil v3_ele_odd ;
hengaila:hengail v3_ele_odd ;
hymmyilä:hymmyil v3_ele_odd ;
kyläilä:kyläil v3_ele_odd ;
lykkäilä:lykk2äil v3_ele_odd ;
hättäilä:hätt2äil v3_ele_odd ;
tarjoila:tarjoil v3_ele_odd ;
chattaila:chatt2ail v3_ele_odd ;
aukaista:auka v3_aise ; ! TODO used to have +v1 ?
karkaista:karka v3_aise ;
kiraista:kira v3_aise ;
halkaista:halka v3_aise ;
hihkaista:hikha v3_aise ;
polkaista:polka v3_aise ;
vetäistä:vetä v3_aise ;
vilkaista:vilka v3_aise ;
sotkaista:sotka v3_ise ;
helistä:hel v3_ise ;
hitistä:hit v3_ise ;
kiristä:kir v3_ise ;
kuhista:kuh v3_ise ;
nurista:nur v3_ise ;
huokaista:huoka v3_aise ;
häikäistä:häikä v3_ise ;
julkaista:julka v3_aise ;
juoksaista:juoksa v3_aise ;
silmäistä:silmä v3_aise ;
jyristä:jyr v3_ise ;
karjaista:karja v3_aise ;
katkaista:katka v3_aise ;
kalaista:kala v3_aise ;
ilmaista:ilma v3_aise ;
kihistä:kih v3_ise ;
kilistä:kil v3_ise ;
kiljaista:kilja v3_aise ;
kiskaista:kiska v3_aise ;
kolista:kol v3_ise ;
kopaista:kopa v3_aise ;
korista:kor v3_ise ;
kraapasta:kraapa v3_aise ;
krapista:krap v3_ise ;
sorista:sor v3_ise ;
tohista:toh v3_ise ;
kusta:kus v3_s ;
kutista:kut v3_ise ;
kysäistä:kysä v3_ise ;
käväistä:kävä v3_ise ;
lakaista:laka v3_aise ;
laukaista:lauka v3_aise ;
lohkaista:lohka v3_aise ;
humista:hum v3_ise ;
lorista:lor v3_ise ;
molista:mol v3_ise ;
mumista:mum v3_ise ;
murista:mur v3_ise ;
mutista:mut v3_ise ;
nielaista:niela v3_aise ;
oikaista:oika v3_aise ;
oikasta:oikas v3_ise ;
pestä:pes v3_s ;
porista:por v3_ise ;
potkaista:potka v3_aise ;
puhkaista:puhka v3_aise ;
päästä:pääs v3_s ;
rangaista:ranga v3_aise ; ! XXX rangaista ??
rankaista:ranka v3_aise ; ! XXX rankaista ??
ratkaista:ratka v3_aise ;
repäistä:repä v3_ise ;
rotista:rot v3_ise ;
rypistä:ryp v3_ise ;
rähistä:räh v3_ise ;
silmästä:silmä v3_ise ;
surista:sur v3_ise ;
sylkäistä:sylkä v3_ise ;
käristä:kär v3_ise ;
täristä:tär v3_ise ;
ulista:ul v3_ise ;
ulvaista:ulva v3_aise ;
vapista:vap v3_ise ;
vilistä:vil v3_ise ;
varista:var v3_ise ;
väristä:vär v3_ise ;
vikistä:vik v3_ise ;
tulla:tul v3_lnr ;
panna:pan v3_lnr ;
mennä:men v3_lnr ;
purra:pur v3_lnr ;
surra:sur v3_lnr ;
nousta:nous v3_s ;
